Washington statutes.
RCW 26.12.215

Revision by the superior court.

All acts and proceedings of the court commissioners shall be subject to revision by the superior court as provided in RCW 2.24.050.

[ 1991 c 367 s 18.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—Captions not law—1991 c 367: See notes following RCW 26.09.015.